Utah statutes.
76-10-1906.   Reporting -- Criminal and civil penalties -- Enforcement.
(1) (a)  A person engaged in a trade or business, except a financial
institution, who receives more than $10,000 as described in Subsection (1)(b)
shall complete and file with the State Bureau of Investigation the information
required by 26 U.S.C. Sec. 6050I, concerning returns relating to currency
received in trade or business.
(b)  Subsection (1)(a) applies if the person described in Subsection (1)
receives more than $10,000 in domestic or foreign currency:
(i)  in one transaction; or
(ii)  through two or more related transactions during one business day.
(c)  A person who knowingly and intentionally fails to comply with the
reporting requirements of this Subsection (1) is:
(i)  on a first conviction, guilty of a class C misdemeanor; and
(ii)  on a second or subsequent conviction, guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
(d)  A person is guilty of a third degree felony who knowingly and
intentionally violates this Subsection (1) and the violation is committed
either:
(i)  in furtherance of the commission of any other violation of state law; or
(ii)  as part of a pattern of illegal activity involving transactions
exceeding $100,000 in any 12-month period.
(2) (a)  The State Bureau of Investigation and the Office of the Attorney
General:
(i)  shall enforce compliance with Subsection (1); and
(ii)  are custodians of and have access to all information and documents filed
under Subsection (1).
(b)  The information is confidential, except a law enforcement agency, county
attorney, or district attorney, when establishing a clear need for the
information for investigative purposes, shall have access to the information
and shall maintain the information in a confidential manner except as
otherwise provided by the Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure.
